Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62K.16] REFERENCE-BASED PRICING HEALTH PLAN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary and upon any necessary federal approval, a health carrier may offer in the individual, small, and large group market a reference-based pricing health plan that meets the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Provider participation. new text end new text begin (a) A reference-based pricing health plan enrollee may access any health care provider who has agreed to (1) a reimbursement rate up to but not greater than the reimbursement rate specified in the enrollee's reference-based pricing plan as defined under this section, and (2) any other terms and conditions offered by the health carrier. Any terms and conditions offered by the health carrier must be the same for all health care providers who agree to participate in the health plan. new text end new text begin (b) A health carrier may require a participating provider to meet reasonable data, utilization review, and quality assurance requirements. new text end new text begin (c) A provider who agrees to participate must provide services to all enrollees of the health plan if the provider's reimbursement rates are equal to or less than that specified in the enrollee's health plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reimbursement rates. new text end new text begin (a) The reimbursement rates offered to providers who agree to participate in a reference-based pricing health plan must be based on a percentage relative to the rates defined by the most recent Medicare reimbursement schedules promulgated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. new text end new text begin (b) For services that do not have a corresponding Medicare reimbursement value, the health carrier must negotiate the rates based on other fee schedules used within the health care market. new text end new text begin (c) If a reference-based pricing health plan's reimbursement rate is at least 120 percent above the Medicare rate and the health plan is offered in all counties throughout Minnesota, the health plan is exempt from the geographic and network adequacy requirements under section 62K.10. new text end new text begin (d) A provider who agrees to participate in the health plan agrees to accept the reimbursement rate as payment in full under the terms of the health plan in accordance with section 62K.11. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Conditions. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section requires a provider to participate in a reference-based pricing health plan. A health carrier is prohibited from requiring, as a condition of participation in any other health plan, product, or other arrangement offered by the health carrier, that the provider participate in a reference-based pricing health plan. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section requires a health carrier to provide coverage for a service or treatment that is not covered under the enrollee's health plan. new text end new text begin (c) A reference-based pricing health plan may impose cost-sharing requirements, including co-payments, deductibles, and coinsurance, and reasonable referral and prior authorization requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meaning given them. new text end new text begin (b) "Provider" has the meaning given in section 62J.03, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (c) "Reference-based pricing health plan" means a health plan in which the employer pays a set price for each service instead of negotiating prices with providers. new text end